en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Outdoor Power Equipment Accessories > Weed Trimmer Accessories > Weed Trimmer Blades & Spools: Weed Trimmer Blades; Weed Trimmer Lines; Weed Trimmer Spools
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Akcesoria do elektronarzędzi ogrodowych > Akcesoria do nożyc do chwastów > Ostrza i żyłki do nożyc: Ostrza do wykaszarki chwastów; Żyłki do podkaszarek; Żyłki do wykaszarki chwastów
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Accessori attrezzatura motorizzata per esterni > Accessori per tagliabordi > Lame e bobine per tagliabordi: Lame per tagliaerba; Fili per decespugliatori; Bobine per tagliaerba
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Accesorii pentru echipamente electrice pentru lucru în aer liber > Accesorii pentru mașini pentru îndepărtat buruieni > Lame și bobine pentru mașini pentru îndepărtat buruieni: Lame pentru mașini pentru îndepărtat buruieni; Fire de tăiere pentru motocoasă; Bobine pentru mașini pentru îndepărtat buruieni
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Elektrikli Bahçe Ekipman Aksesuarları > Ot Kesme Makinesi Aksesuarları > Ot Kesme Makinesi Bıçakları ve Makaraları: Ot Kesme Makinesi Bıçakları; Misinalı Tırpan İpleri; Ot Kesme Makinesi Makaraları
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Tillbehör till utomhusmaskiner > Ogräsklippartillbehör > Blad och spolar till ogräsklippare: Ogrästrimmerblad; Ogrästrimmertråd; Ogrästrimmerspolar
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικού εξοπλισμού εξωτερικού χώρου > Αξεσουάρ χορτοκοπτικού μηχανήματος > Λεπίδες και καρούλια χορτοκοπτικού μηχανήματος: Λεπίδες χορτοκοπτικού μηχανήματος; Μεσινέζες χορτοκοπτικού; Καρούλια χορτοκοπτικού μηχανήματος
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Príslušenstvo pre vonkajšie elektrické zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre strihače buriny > Čepele a cievky pre strihače buriny: Čepele pre strihače buriny; Struny na strihače buriny; Cievky pre strihače buriny
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 園藝機械器具配件 > 雜草修剪器配件 > 雜草修剪器刀片和線軸: 除草機刀片; 除草機牛筋繩; 除草機線軸
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Dodatki za zunanjo električno opremo > Dodatki za obrezovalnike plevela > Rezila in tuljave za obrezovalnike plevela: Rezila za obrezovalnike plevela; Nitke za obrezovalnike plevela; Tuljave za obrezovalnike plevela
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Elektriske haveredskaber – tilbehør > Tilbehør til kantklippere > Blade og liner til kantklippere: Kantklippere – blade; Liner til kantklippere; Kantklippere – liner
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > ガーデン機器関連用品 > 草刈り機関連用品 > 草刈り機用替刃・スプール: 草刈り機用替刃; 草刈り機用ライン; 草刈り機用スプール
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kültéri elektromos berendezés kiegészítők > Gyomvágó-kiegészítők > Gyomvágó pengék és orsók: Gyomvágó pengék; Gyomvágó-damilok; Gyomvágó orsók
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Acessórios para equipamento elétrico de exteriores de residências > Acessórios para aparador de erva daninha > Lâminas e carreteis para aparador de grama: Lâminas para aparador de erva daninha; Fios de corte para aparadores de grama; Carretéis para aparador de erva daninha
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Motorová zahradní technika – příslušenství > Křovinořezy – příslušenství > Křovinořezy – čepele a cívky: Křovinořezy – čepele; Struny do vyžínačů; Křovinořezy – cívky
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Zubehör für Gartenmaschinen > Unkrauttrimmer-Zubehör > Messer & Kabelrollen für Rasentrimmer: Messer für Rasentrimmer; Rasentrimmerfäden; Kabelrollen für Rasentrimmer
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Tilbehør til utendørs elektrisk utstyr > Tilbehør til ugressklippere > Blader og spoler til ugressklippere: Blader til ugressklippere; Snorer til ugressklippere; Spoler til ugressklippere
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Аксесоари за електрическо оборудване за външна употреба > Аксесоари за тример за плевели > Остриета и бобини за тример за плевели: Остриета за тример за плевели; Въжета за тример за плевели; Бобини за тример за плевели
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Accessoires pour équipement électrique d’extérieur > Accessoires pour débroussailleuses > Lames et bobines pour débroussailleuses: Lames pour débroussailleuses; Fils pour coupe-herbe; Bobines pour débroussailleuses
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 户外电力设备配件 > 杂草修剪机配件 > 杂草修剪机刀片/线轴: 杂草修剪机刀片; 除草机线; 杂草修剪机线轴
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Аксессуары для садовой техники > Аксессуары для косилок-триммеров > Ножи и катушки для косилок-триммеров: Ножи для косилок-триммеров; Леска для косилок-триммеров; Катушки для косилок-триммеров
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Ulkokäyttöisten voimatyökalujen lisätarvikkeet > Ruohotrimmerin lisätarvikkeet > Ruohotrimmerin terät ja kelat: Ruohotrimmerin terät; Ruohotrimmerin siimat; Ruohotrimmerin kelat
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Accessoires voor elektrische apparatuur voor buitengebruik > Accessoires voor onkruidtrimmers > Bladen en spoelen voor onkruidtrimmers: Bladen voor onkruidtrimmers; Trimmerdraad; Spoelen voor onkruidtrimmers
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 야외용 동력 설비 부대용품 > 제초기 부대용품 > 제초기 날/스풀: 제초기 칼날; 예초기 라인; 제초기 스풀
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Accesorios para maquinaria de jardinería > Accesorios para desbrozadoras > Cuchillas y cabezales para desbrozadoras: Cuchillas para desbrozadoras; Hilo para motoguadaña; Cabezales para desbrozadoras
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện ngoài trời > Phụ kiện máy xén cỏ > Lưỡi dao và cuộn cước máy xén cỏ: Lưỡi dao máy xén cỏ; Dây cước máy cắt cỏ; Cuộn cước máy xén cỏ
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Pribor za vanjsku električnu opremu > Dodaci za trimere za korov > Oštrice i kalemi za trimer: Oštrice za trimer; Niti za trimere; Kalemi za trimer
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Lauko motorinės įrangos priedai > Piktžolių žoliapjovių priedai > Piktžolių žoliapjovių peiliai ir ritės: Piktžolių žoliapjovių peiliai; Piktžolių žoliapjovių žarnelės; Piktžolių žoliapjovių ritės
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Acessórios de equipamento elétrico de exterior > Acessórios para aparador de erva > Lâminas e bobinas para aparador de relva: Lâminas para aparador de relva; Fios para aparador de relva; Bobinas para aparador de relva
th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > อุปกรณ์ไฟฟ้าสำหรับใช้งานกลางแจ้ง > อุปกรณ์ที่เล็มวัชพืช > ใบมีดและแกนหมุนสำหรับที่เล็มวัชพืช: ใบมีดเล็มวัชพืช; สายเอ็นเครื่องตัดหญ้า; แกนเครื่องตัดแต่งวัชพืช